Vermont statutes. Title 33 Human Services
Subchapter 1. Vermont Health Benefit Exchange

§ 1801.
Purpose.

It is the intent of the General Assembly to establish a Vermont Health Benefit Exchange which meets the policy established in

18 V.S.A. § 9401

and, to the extent allowable under federal law or a waiver of federal law, becomes the mechanism to create Green Mountain Care.

The purpose of the Vermont Health Benefit Exchange is to facilitate the purchase of affordable, qualified health benefit plans in the individual and group markets in this State in order to reduce the number of uninsured and underinsured; to reduce disruption when individuals lose employer-based insurance; to reduce administrative costs in the insurance market; to contain costs; to promote health, prevention, and healthy lifestyles by individuals; and to improve quality of health care.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to reduce, diminish, or otherwise infringe upon the benefits provided to eligible individuals under Medicare.

HISTORY:

Added

2011, No. 48

, § 4.

§ 1802.
Definitions.

As used in this subchapter:

“Affordable Care Act” means the federal Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act, Pub. L. No. 111-148, as amended by the federal Health Care and Education Reconciliation Act of 2010, Pub. L. No. 111-152, and as further amended.

“Commissioner” means the Commissioner of Vermont Health Access.

“Health benefit plan” means a policy, contract, certificate, or agreement offered or issued by a health insurer to provide, deliver, arrange for, pay for, or reimburse any of the costs of health services. This term does not include coverage only for accident or disability income insurance, liability insurance, coverage issued as a supplement to liability insurance, workers’ compensation or similar insurance, automobile medical payment insurance, credit-only insurance, coverage for on-site medical clinics, or other similar insurance coverage where benefits for health services are secondary or incidental to other insurance benefits as provided under the Affordable Care Act. The term also does not include stand-alone dental or vision benefits; long-term care insurance; short-term, limited-duration health insurance; specific disease or other limited benefit coverage, Medicare supplemental health benefits, Medicare Advantage plans, and other similar benefits excluded under the Affordable Care Act.

“Health insurer” shall have the same meaning as in

18 V.S.A. § 9402

.

“Qualified employer”:

means an entity that employed an average of not more than 50 employees on working days during the preceding calendar year and that:

has its principal place of business in this State and elects to provide coverage for its eligible employees through the Vermont Health Benefit Exchange, regardless of where an employee resides; or

elects to provide coverage through the Vermont Health Benefit Exchange for all of its eligible employees who are principally employed in this State;

on and after January 1, 2016, shall include an entity that:

employed an average of not more than 100 employees on working days during the preceding calendar year; and

meets the requirements of subdivisions (A)(i) and (A)(ii) of this subdivision (5).

[Repealed.]

“Qualified entity” means an entity with experience in individual and group health insurance, benefit administration, or other experience relevant to health benefit program eligibility, enrollment, or support.

“Qualified health benefit plan” means a health benefit plan that meets the requirements set forth in section 1806 of this title.

“Qualified individual” means an individual, including a minor, who is a Vermont resident and, at the time of enrollment:

is not incarcerated, or is only incarcerated awaiting disposition of charges; and

is, or is reasonably expected to be during the time of enrollment, a citizen or national of the United States or an immigrant lawfully present in the United States as defined by federal law.

“Modified adjusted gross income” shall have the same meaning as in 26 U.S.C. § 36B(d)(2)(B).

“Reflective health benefit plan” means a health benefit plan that meets the requirements set forth in section 1813 of this title.

HISTORY:

Added

2011, No. 48

, § 4; amended

2011, No. 171

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

2013, No. 50

, § E.307, eff. Oct. 1, 2013;

2015, No. 54

, § 13, eff. June 5, 2015;

2015, No. 151

(Adj. Sess.), § 1. 2018;

2017, No. 88

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. Feb. 20, 2018;

2017, No. 131

(Adj. Sess.), § 5, eff. May 16, 2018;

2019, No. 19

, § 4, eff. Jan. 1, 2020.

§ 1803.
Vermont Health Benefit Exchange.

The Department of Vermont Health Access shall establish the Vermont Health Benefit Exchange, which shall be administered by the Department in consultation with the Advisory Committee established in section 402 of this title.
(a) (1) The Department of Vermont Health Access shall establish the Vermont Health Benefit Exchange, which shall be administered by the Department in consultation with the Advisory Committee established in section 402 of this title.

The Vermont Health Benefit Exchange shall be considered a division within the Department of Vermont Health Access and shall be headed by a Deputy Commissioner as provided in 3 V.S.A. chapter 53.

The Vermont Health Benefit Exchange shall provide qualified individuals and qualified employers with qualified health benefit plans, including the multistate plans required by the Affordable Care Act, with effective dates beginning on or before January 1, 2014. The Vermont Health Benefit Exchange may contract with qualified entities or enter into intergovernmental agreements to facilitate the functions provided by the Vermont Health Benefit Exchange.
(b) (1) (A) The Vermont Health Benefit Exchange shall provide qualified individuals and qualified employers with qualified health benefit plans, including the multistate plans required by the Affordable Care Act, with effective dates beginning on or before January 1, 2014. The Vermont Health Benefit Exchange may contract with qualified entities or enter into intergovernmental agreements to facilitate the functions provided by the Vermont Health Benefit Exchange.

Prior to contracting with any health insurer, the Vermont Health Benefit Exchange shall consider the insurer’s historic rate increase information required under section 1806 of this title, along with the information and the recommendations provided to the Vermont Health Benefit Exchange by the Commissioner of Financial Regulation under Section 2794(b)(1)(B) of the federal Public Health Service Act.

To the extent allowable under federal law, the Vermont Health Benefit Exchange may offer health benefits to populations in addition to those eligible under Subtitle D of Title I of the Affordable Care Act, including:

to individuals and employers who are not qualified individuals or qualified employers as defined by this subchapter and by the Affordable Care Act;

Medicaid benefits to individuals who are eligible, upon approval by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services and provided that including these individuals in the Health Benefit Exchange would not reduce their Medicaid benefits;

Medicare benefits to individuals who are eligible, upon approval by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services and provided that including these individuals in the Health Benefit Exchange would not reduce their Medicare benefits; and

State employees and municipal employees, including teachers.

To the extent allowable under federal law, the Vermont Health Benefit Exchange may offer health benefits to employees for injuries arising out of or in the course of employment in lieu of medical benefits provided pursuant to 21 V.S.A. chapter 9 (workers’ compensation).

To the extent permitted by the U.S. Department of Health and Human Services, the Vermont Health Benefit Exchange shall permit qualified individuals and qualified employers to purchase qualified health benefit plans through the Exchange website, through navigators, by telephone, or directly from a health insurer under contract with the Vermont Health Benefit Exchange.

The Vermont Health Benefit Exchange may determine an appropriate method to provide a unified, simplified administration system for health insurers offering qualified health benefit plans. The Exchange may include claims administration, benefit management, billing, or other components in the unified system and may achieve simplification by contracting with a single entity for administration and management of all qualified health benefit plans, by licensing or requiring the use of particular software, by requiring health insurers to conform to a standard set of systems and rules, or by another method determined by the Commissioner.
(c) (1) The Vermont Health Benefit Exchange may determine an appropriate method to provide a unified, simplified administration system for health insurers offering qualified health benefit plans. The Exchange may include claims administration, benefit management, billing, or other components in the unified system and may achieve simplification by contracting with a single entity for administration and management of all qualified health benefit plans, by licensing or requiring the use of particular software, by requiring health insurers to conform to a standard set of systems and rules, or by another method determined by the Commissioner.

The Vermont Health Benefit Exchange may offer certain services, such as wellness programs and services designed to simplify administrative processes, to health insurers offering plans outside the Exchange, to workers’ compensation insurers, to employers, and to other entities.

The Vermont Health Benefit Exchange may enter into information-sharing agreements with federal and State agencies and other state exchanges to carry out its responsibilities under this subchapter, provided such agreements include adequate protections with respect to the confidentiality of the information to be shared and provided such agreements comply with all applicable State and federal laws and regulations.

HISTORY:

Added

2011, No. 48

, § 4; amended

2013, No. 144

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. May 27, 2014;

2015, No. 54

, § 11, eff. June 5, 2015.

§ 1804.
Qualified employers.

Until January 1, 2016, a qualified employer shall be an entity that employed an average of not more than 50 employees on working days during the preceding calendar year, and the term “qualified employer” includes self-employed persons to the extent permitted under the Affordable Care Act. Calculation of the number of employees of a qualified employer shall not include a part-time employee who works fewer than 30 hours per week or a seasonal worker as defined in 26 U.S.C. § 4980H(c)(2)(B).
(a) (1) Until January 1, 2016, a qualified employer shall be an entity that employed an average of not more than 50 employees on working days during the preceding calendar year, and the term “qualified employer” includes self-employed persons to the extent permitted under the Affordable Care Act. Calculation of the number of employees of a qualified employer shall not include a part-time employee who works fewer than 30 hours per week or a seasonal worker as defined in 26 U.S.C. § 4980H(c)(2)(B).

An employer with 50 or fewer employees that offers a qualified health benefit plan to its employees through the Vermont Health Benefit Exchange may continue to participate in the Exchange even if the employer’s size grows beyond 50 employees, as long as the employer continuously makes qualified health benefit plans in the Vermont Health Benefit Exchange available to its employees.

On and after January 1, 2016, a qualified employer shall be an entity that employed an average of not more than 100 employees on working days during the preceding calendar year, and the term “qualified employer” includes self-employed persons to the extent permitted under the Affordable Care Act. The number of employees shall be calculated using the method set forth in 26 U.S.C. § 4980H(c)(2).
(b) (1) On and after January 1, 2016, a qualified employer shall be an entity that employed an average of not more than 100 employees on working days during the preceding calendar year, and the term “qualified employer” includes self-employed persons to the extent permitted under the Affordable Care Act. The number of employees shall be calculated using the method set forth in 26 U.S.C. § 4980H(c)(2).

An employer with 100 or fewer employees that offers a qualified health benefit plan to its employees through the Vermont Health Benefit Exchange may continue to participate in the Exchange even if the employer’s size grows beyond 100 employees, as long as the employer continuously makes qualified health benefit plans in the Vermont Health Benefit Exchange available to its employees.

[Repealed.]

HISTORY:

Added

2011, No. 171

(Adj. Sess.), § 2; amended

2013, No. 79

, § 28, eff. Oct. 1, 2013;

2015, No. 54

, § 14, eff. June 5, 2015;

2015, No. 151

(Adj. Sess.), § 2.

§ 1805.
Duties and responsibilities.

The Vermont Health Benefit Exchange shall have the following duties and responsibilities consistent with the Affordable Care Act:

offering coverage for health services through qualified health benefit plans, including by creating a process for:

the certification, decertification, and recertification of qualified health benefit plans as described in section 1806 of this title;

enrolling qualified individuals in qualified health benefit plans, including through open enrollment periods as provided in the Affordable Care Act, and ensuring that individuals may transfer coverage between qualified health benefit plans and other sources of coverage as seamlessly as possible; and

creating a simplified and uniform system for the administration of health benefits;

determining eligibility for and enrolling individuals in Medicaid, Dr. Dynasaur, and VPharm pursuant to chapter 19 of this title, as well as any other public health benefit program;

creating and maintaining consumer assistance tools, including a website through which enrollees and prospective enrollees of qualified health benefit plans may obtain standardized comparative information on such plans, a toll-free telephone hotline to respond to requests for assistance, and interactive online communication tools, in a manner that complies with the Americans with Disabilities Act;

creating standardized forms and formats for presenting health benefit options in the Vermont Health Benefit Exchange, including the use of the uniform outline of coverage established under Section 2715 of the federal Public Health Services Act;

assigning a quality and wellness rating to each qualified health benefit plan offered through the Vermont Health Benefit Exchange and determining each qualified health benefit plan’s level of coverage in accordance with regulations issued by the U.S. Department of Health and Human Services;

determining enrollee subsidies as required by the Secretary of the U.S. Department of the Treasury or of the U.S. Department of Health and Human Services and informing consumers of eligibility for subsidies, including by providing an electronic calculator to determine the actual cost of coverage after application of any premium tax credit under Section 36B of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 and any cost-sharing reduction under Section 1402 of the Affordable Care Act;

transferring to the Secretary of the U.S. Department of the Treasury the name and taxpayer identification number of each individual who was an employee of an employer but who was determined to be eligible for the premium tax credit under Section 36B of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 for the following reasons:

the employer did not provide minimum essential coverage; or

the employer provided the minimum essential coverage, but it was determined under Section 36B(c)(2)(C) of the Internal Revenue Code to be either unaffordable to the employee or not to provide the required minimum actuarial value;

performing duties required by the Secretary of the U.S. Department of Health and Human Services or the Secretary of the U.S. Department of the Treasury related to determining eligibility for the individual responsibility requirement exemptions, including:

granting a certification attesting that an individual is exempt from the individual responsibility requirement or from the penalty for violating that requirement, if there is no affordable qualified health benefit plan available through the Vermont Health Benefit Exchange or the individual’s employer for that individual or if the individual meets the requirements for any exemption from the individual responsibility requirement or from the penalty pursuant to Section 5000A of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986; and

transferring to the Secretary of the U.S. Department of the Treasury a list of the individuals who are issued a certification under subdivision (8)(A) of this section, including the name and taxpayer identification number of each individual;

transferring to the Secretary of the U.S. Department of the Treasury the name and taxpayer identification number of each individual who notifies the Vermont Health Benefit Exchange that he or she has changed employers and of each individual who ceases coverage under a qualified health benefit plan during a plan year and the effective date of that cessation; and
(9) (A) transferring to the Secretary of the U.S. Department of the Treasury the name and taxpayer identification number of each individual who notifies the Vermont Health Benefit Exchange that he or she has changed employers and of each individual who ceases coverage under a qualified health benefit plan during a plan year and the effective date of that cessation; and

communicating to each employer the name of each of its employees and the effective date of the cessation reported to the U.S. Department of the Treasury under this subdivision;

establishing a navigator program as described in section 1807 of this title;

reviewing the rate of premium growth within and outside the Vermont Health Benefit Exchange;

[Repealed.]

providing consumers and health care professionals with satisfaction surveys and other mechanisms for evaluating the performance of qualified health benefit plans and informing the Commissioner of Vermont Health Access and the Commissioner of Financial Regulation of such performance;

ensuring consumers have easy and simple access to the relevant grievance and appeals processes pursuant to 8 V.S.A. chapter 107 and

3 V.S.A. § 3090

(Human Services Board);

consulting with the Advisory Committee established in section 402 of this title to obtain information and advice as necessary to fulfill the duties outlined in this subchapter;

referring consumers to the Office of the Health Care Advocate for assistance with grievances, appeals, and other issues involving the Vermont Health Benefit Exchange; and

establishing procedures, including payment mechanisms and standard fee or compensation schedules, that allow licensed insurance agents and brokers to be appropriately compensated outside the navigator program established in section 1807 of this title for:

assisting with the enrollment of qualified individuals and qualified employers in any qualified health plan offered through the Exchange for which the individual or employer is eligible; and

assisting qualified individuals in applying for premium tax credits and cost-sharing reductions for qualified health benefit plans purchased through the Exchange.

HISTORY:

Added

2011, No. 48

, § 4; amended

2011, No. 78

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. April 2, 2012;

2011, No. 171

(Adj. Sess.), § 2d;

2013, No. 79

, § 29, eff. Oct. 1, 2013;

2013, No. 79

, § 35g, eff. January 1, 2014;

2021, No. 74

, § E.306.1, eff. Oct. 1, 2021.

§ 1806.
Qualified health benefit plans.

Prior to contracting with a health insurer to offer a qualified health benefit plan, the Commissioner shall determine that making the plan available through the Vermont Health Benefit Exchange is in the best interests of individuals and qualified employers in this State. In determining the best interests, the Commissioner shall consider affordability; promotion of high-quality care, prevention, and wellness; promotion of access to health care; participation in the State’s health care reform efforts; and such other criteria as the Commissioner, in the Commissioner’s discretion, deems appropriate.

A qualified health benefit plan shall provide the following benefits:
(b) (1) A qualified health benefit plan shall provide the following benefits:

The essential benefits package required by Section 1302(a) of the Affordable Care Act and any additional benefits required by the Secretary of Human Services by rule after consultation with the Advisory Committee established in section 402 of this title and after approval from the Green Mountain Care Board established in 18 V.S.A. chapter 220.

Notwithstanding subdivision (1)(A) of this subsection (b), a health insurer or a stand-alone dental insurer, including a nonprofit dental service corporation, may offer a plan that provides only limited dental benefits, either separately or in conjunction with a qualified health benefit plan, if it meets the requirements of Section 9832(c)(2)(A) of the Internal Revenue Code and provides pediatric dental benefits meeting the requirements of Section 1302(b)(1)(J) of the Affordable Care Act. Said plans may include child-only policies or family policies. If permitted under federal law, a qualified health benefit plan offered in conjunction with a stand-alone dental plan providing pediatric dental benefits meeting the requirements of Section 1302(b)(1)(J) of the Affordable Care Act shall be deemed to meet the requirements of this subsection.

At least the bronze level of coverage as defined by Section 1302 of the Affordable Care Act and the cost-sharing limitations for individuals provided in Section 1302 of the Affordable Care Act, as well as any more restrictive cost-sharing requirements specified by the Secretary of Human Services by rule after consultation with the Advisory Committee established in section 402 of this title and after approval from the Green Mountain Care Board established in 18 V.S.A. chapter 220.

For qualified health benefit plans offered to employers, a deductible that meets the limitations provided in Section 1302 of the Affordable Care Act and any more restrictive deductible requirements specified by the Secretary of Human Services by rule after consultation with the Advisory Committee established in section 402 of this title and after approval from the Green Mountain Care Board established in 18 V.S.A. chapter 220.

A qualified health benefit plan shall meet the following minimum prevention, quality, and wellness requirements:

standards for marketing practices, network adequacy, essential community providers in underserved areas, appropriate services to enable access for underserved individuals or populations, accreditation, quality improvement, and information on quality measures for health benefit plan performance, as provided in Section 1311 of the Affordable Care Act and any more restrictive requirements provided by 8 V.S.A. chapter 107;

quality and wellness standards, including a requirement for joint quality improvement activities with other plans, as specified in rule by the Secretary of Human Services, after consultation with the Commissioners of Health and of Financial Regulation and with the Advisory Committee established in section 402 of this title; and

standards for participation in the Blueprint for Health as provided in 18 V.S.A. chapter 13.

A health insurer offering a qualified health benefit plan shall use the uniform enrollment forms and descriptions of coverage provided by the Commissioners of Vermont Health Access and of Financial Regulation.

A health insurer offering a qualified health benefit plan shall comply with the following insurance and consumer information requirements:
(e) (1) A health insurer offering a qualified health benefit plan shall comply with the following insurance and consumer information requirements:

obtain premium approval through the rate review process provided in 8 V.S.A. chapter 107; and
(A) (i) obtain premium approval through the rate review process provided in 8 V.S.A. chapter 107; and

submit to the Commissioner of Financial Regulation a justification for any premium increase before implementation of that increase and prominently post this information on the health insurer’s website.

Offer at least one qualified health benefit plan at the silver level and at least one qualified health benefit plan at the gold level that meet the requirements of Section 1302 of the Affordable Care Act and any additional requirements specified by the Secretary of Human Services by rule. In addition, a health insurer may choose to offer one or more qualified health benefit plans at the platinum level that meet the requirements of Section 1302 of the Affordable Care Act and any additional requirements specified by the Secretary of Human Services by rule.

Charge the same premium rate for a health benefit plan without regard to whether the plan is offered through the Vermont Health Benefit Exchange and without regard to whether the plan is offered directly from the carrier or through an insurance agent.

Provide accurate and timely disclosure of information to the public and to the Vermont Health Benefit Exchange relating to claims denials, enrollment data, rating practices, out-of-network coverage, enrollee and participant rights provided by Title I of the Affordable Care Act, and other information as required by the Commissioner of Vermont Health Access or by the Commissioner of Financial Regulation. The Commissioner of Financial Regulation shall define, by rule, the acceptable time frame for provision of information in accordance with this subdivision.

Provide information in a timely manner to an individual, upon request, regarding the cost-sharing amounts for that individual’s health benefit plan.

A health insurer offering a qualified health benefit plan shall comply with all other insurance requirements for health insurers as provided in 8 V.S.A. chapter 107 and as specified by rule by the Commissioner of Financial Regulation.

Consistent with Section 1311(e)(1)(B) of the Affordable Care Act, the Vermont Health Benefit Exchange shall not exclude a health benefit plan:

on the basis that the plan is a fee-for-service plan;

through the imposition of premium price controls by the Vermont Health Benefit Exchange; or

on the basis that the health benefit plan provides for treatments necessary to prevent patients’ deaths in circumstances the Vermont Health Benefit Exchange determines are inappropriate or too costly.

The Vermont Health Benefit Exchange shall clearly indicate to any prospective purchaser of a bronze-level plan, and of other plans as appropriate, the potential for significant out-of-pocket costs, in addition to the premium, associated with the plan.

HISTORY:

Added

2011, No. 48

, § 4; amended

2011, No. 171

(Adj. Sess.), §§ 2a, 2h;

2021, No. 20

, § 297.

§ 1807.
Navigators.

The Vermont Health Benefit Exchange shall establish a navigator program to assist individuals and employers in enrolling in a qualified health benefit plan offered under the Vermont Health Benefit Exchange. The Vermont Health Benefit Exchange shall select individuals and entities qualified to serve as navigators and shall award grants to navigators for the performance of their duties.
(a) (1) The Vermont Health Benefit Exchange shall establish a navigator program to assist individuals and employers in enrolling in a qualified health benefit plan offered under the Vermont Health Benefit Exchange. The Vermont Health Benefit Exchange shall select individuals and entities qualified to serve as navigators and shall award grants to navigators for the performance of their duties.

The Vermont Health Benefit Exchange shall ensure that navigators are available to provide assistance in person or through interactive technology to individuals in all regions of the State in a manner that complies with the Americans with Disabilities Act.

Consistent with Section 1311(i)(4) of the Affordable Care Act, health insurers shall not serve as navigators, and no navigator shall receive any compensation from a health insurer in connection with enrolling individuals or employees in qualified health benefit plans.

Navigators shall have the following duties:

conduct public education activities to raise awareness of the availability of qualified health benefit plans;

distribute fair and impartial information concerning enrollment in qualified health benefit plans and concerning the availability of premium tax credits and cost-sharing reductions;

facilitate enrollment in qualified health benefit plans, Medicaid, Dr. Dynasaur, VPharm, and other public health benefit programs;

provide referrals to the Office of the Health Care Advocate and any other appropriate agency for any enrollee with a grievance, complaint, or question regarding his or her health benefit plan, coverage, or a determination under that plan or coverage;

provide information in a manner that is culturally and linguistically appropriate to the needs of the population being served by the Vermont Health Benefit Exchange; and

distribute information to health care professionals, community organizations, and others to facilitate the enrollment of individuals who are eligible for Medicaid, Dr. Dynasaur, VPharm, other public health benefit programs, or the Vermont Health Benefit Exchange in order to ensure that all eligible individuals are enrolled.

[Repealed.]

HISTORY:

Added

2011, No. 48

, § 4; amended

2011, No. 171

(Adj. Sess.), § 2b;

2013, No. 79

, §§ 22, 35h, eff. Jan. 1, 2014;

2019, No. 15

, § 1, eff. May 6, 2019.

§ 1808.
Financial integrity.

The Vermont Health Benefit Exchange shall:

keep an accurate accounting of all activities, receipts, and expenditures and submit this information annually as required by federal law; and

cooperate with the Secretary of the U.S. Department of Health and Human Services or the Inspector General of the U.S. Department of Health and Human Services in any investigation into the affairs of the Vermont Health Benefit Exchange, any examination of the properties and records of the Vermont Health Benefit Exchange, or any requirement for periodic reports in relation to the activities undertaken by the Vermont Health Benefit Exchange.

In carrying out its activities under this subchapter, the Vermont Health Benefit Exchange shall not use any funds intended for the administrative and operational expenses of the Vermont Health Benefit Exchange for staff retreats, promotional giveaways, excessive executive compensation, or promotion of federal or State legislative or regulatory modifications.

HISTORY:

Added

2011, No. 48

, § 4.

§ 1809.
Publication of costs and satisfaction surveys.

The Vermont Health Benefit Exchange shall publish the average costs of licensing, regulatory fees, and any other payments required by the Exchange, as well as the administrative costs of the Exchange, on a website intended to educate consumers about such costs. This information shall include information on monies lost to waste, fraud, and abuse.

The Vermont Health Benefit Exchange shall publish the deidentified results of the satisfaction surveys and other evaluation mechanisms required pursuant to subdivision 1805(13) of this title on a website intended to enable consumers to compare the qualified health benefit plans offered through the Exchange.

HISTORY:

Added

2011, No. 48

, § 4.

§ 1810.
Rules.

The Secretary of Human Services may adopt rules pursuant to 3 V.S.A. chapter 25 as needed to carry out the duties and functions established in this subchapter.

HISTORY:

Added

2011, No. 48

, § 4.